District of Columbia statutes.
50-1104

Vehicles exempt from fee.

All motor vehicles and trailers owned and officially used by the government of the United States, the government of the District of Columbia or the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority shall be subject to inspection.

Feb. 18, 1938, 52 Stat. 78, ch. 31, § 4
July 16, 1947, 61 Stat. 360, ch. 258, Art. IV, § 3
Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-289, § 203(b), 48 DCR 2057
Publicly owned vehicles, see § 50-201 et seq.
1981 Ed., § 40-204.
1973 Ed., § 40-204.
D.C. Law 13-289 rewrote the section which had read:
“All motor vehicles and trailers owned and officially used by the government of the United States or by the government of the District of Columbia or by the representatives of foreign governments, shall be subject to annual inspection, such inspections to be furnished without charge.”